District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.11

Private right of action.

(a)

Any consumer injured as a result of a violation of § 22-3226.06, § 22-3226.07, or § 22-3226.08 may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to recover or obtain any of the following:

(1)

A declaratory judgment;

(2)

Injunctive relief;

(3)

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs;

(4)

Actual damages;

(5)

Punitive damages; and

(6)

Any other equitable relief which the court deems proper.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter shall prevent any consumer who is injured by any other trade practice from exercising any right or seeking any remedy to which the consumer might be entitled.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126k
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039